Hawaii statutes.
§143-7 Pounds and animal control officers.
The council of each county may establish and maintain pounds for the impounding
of dogs under this chapter, and may provide for the appointment and
compensation of animal control officers who shall have all the powers of a
sheriff or police officer in carrying out this chapter. [L 1941, c 268, §13; RL
1945, §7164; RL 1955, §156-7; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §143-7; am L 1983, c
227, §4; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next